Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-327.05
Fish and wildlife education programs; fees authorized.

The commission may establish and collect reasonable fees for providing programs relating to fish and wildlife education. Fees for providing such programs shall not exceed the costs of staffing and materials for such programs. The proceeds of all such fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Game and Parks Commission Educational Fund.

Laws 2026, LB979, § 6.
July 18, 2026